Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.210

Assessments—Constitute personal debt.

Any due and payable assessments herein levied shall constitute a personal debt of every person so assessed or who otherwise owes the same and shall be due and payable as provided for in RCW 15.26.200, unless the commission by rules or regulations provides for payment to be made not later than thirty days after the time set forth in RCW 15.26.200: PROVIDED, That such extension of time shall not apply to any person who is in arrears in his or her payments to the commission.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6034; 1969 c 129 s 21.]